dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="vri/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enere</l>     <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eneste</l>    <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enest</l>     <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="barfros/set__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>set<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="un/ne__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nete</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nete</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kverv/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bruk/ken__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>ken<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stus/s__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sere</l>      <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seste</l>     <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sest</l>      <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ekke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>akte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkende</l>   <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkte</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkte</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkt</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkt</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekte</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekt</l>       <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukken</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ihelfrosset">     <i>ihelfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hustren">         <i>hustr</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brukken">         <i>bruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="barfrosset">      <i>barfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blass">           <i>blas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomfrosset">  <i>gjennomfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blåfrosset">      <i>blåfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ihjelfrosset">    <i>ihjelfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heiltrukken">     <i>heiltruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="huldren">         <i>huldr</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hardfrosset">     <i>hardfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="berrfrosset">     <i>berrfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dypfrosset">      <i>dypfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hvass">           <i>hvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastfrosset">     <i>fastfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="djupfrosset">     <i>djupfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heltrukken">      <i>heltruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uttrukken">       <i>uttruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ukvass">          <i>ukvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uhvass">          <i>uhvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stuss">           <i>stus</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vrien">           <i>vri</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="undren">          <i>undr</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unne">            <i>un</i><par n="un/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sylhvass">        <i>sylhvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vasstrukken">     <i>vasstruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stivfrosset">     <i>stivfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sylkvass">        <i>sylkvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vildren">         <i>vildr</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilfrosset">      <i>tilfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svimren">         <i>svimr</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sylspiss">        <i>sylspis</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tuslen">          <i>tusl</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="misunne">         <i>misun</i><par n="un/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="krass">           <i>kras</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kverve">          <i>kverv</i><par n="kverv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kvass">           <i>kvas</i><par n="stus/s__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nytrukken">       <i>nytruk</i><par n="bruk/ken__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedfrosset">      <i>nedfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kraslen">         <i>krasl</i><par n="vri/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innefrosset">     <i>innefros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rekke">           <i>r</i><par n="r/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kunstfrosset">    <i>kunstfros</i><par n="barfros/set__adj"/></e>
